Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.210

Court initiated issuance of sexual assault no-contact orders—Terms, conditions, requirements, etc.

(1)(a) When any person charged with or arrested for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, a violation of RCW 9A.44.096, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090, or a gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030, is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release may prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim. The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether that person should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may issue, by telephone, a sexual assault no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having contact with the victim or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location.

(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(c) The sexual assault no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible.

(2)(a) At the time of arraignment or whenever a motion is brought to modify the conditions of the defendant's release, the court shall determine whether a sexual assault no-contact order shall be issued or extended. If a sexual assault no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the electronic monitoring.

(b) A sexual assault no-contact order issued by the court in conjunction with criminal charges shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed, unless the victim files an independent action for a sexual assault protection order. If the victim files an independent action for a sexual assault protection order, the order may be continued by the court until a full hearing is conducted pursuant to chapter 7.105 RCW.

(3)(a) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 7.105 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest. You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order."

(b) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim at no charge.

(4) If a sexual assault no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this state which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.

(5) Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state.

(6)(a) When a defendant is found guilty of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, any violation of RCW 9A.44.096, or any violation of RCW 9.68A.090, or any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030, and a condition of the sentence restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, the condition shall be recorded as a sexual assault no-contact order.

(b) The written order entered as a condition of sentencing shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 7.105 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest. You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order."

(c) A final sexual assault no-contact order entered in conjunction with a criminal prosecution shall remain in effect for a period of two years following the expiration of any sentence of imprisonment and subsequent period of community supervision, conditional release, probation, or parole.

(d) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim at no charge.

(7) A knowing violation of a court order issued under subsection (1), (2), or (6) of this section is punishable under RCW 7.105.450.

(8) Whenever a sexual assault no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated under subsection (1), (2), or (6) of this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection (2) of this section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

[ 2021 c 215 s 164; 2006 c 138 s 16. Formerly RCW 7.90.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.